Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-603.5] Additional civil penalties
for securities violations committed against elders. If a person commits a
violation under this chapter and the violation is directed toward, targets, or
is committed against a person who at the time of the violation is sixty-two
years of age or older, a court, in addition to any other civil penalty, may
impose a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000 for each violation; provided that
this section shall not apply to registered broker-dealers for violations of
[section] 485A-412(d)(9). [L 2007, c 95, pt of §2]

Cross References

Some other actions or penalties for violations committed
against elders, see §§28-94, 412:3-114.5, 444-10.7, 454-4.5, 480-13, 480-13.5,
485A-604.5, and 487-14.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next